District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-301.63

Dissolution — Survival of remedy.

Repealed.

Aug. 6, 1962, 76 Stat. 289, Pub. L. 87-569, § 63
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(l), 58 DCR 1720
2001 Ed., § 29-301.63.
1981 Ed., § 29-564.
1973 Ed., § 29-1063.